Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-819
Personal property tax; lien upon personal property.

Taxes assessed upon personal property in a city of the primary class shall be a lien upon the personal property of the person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation assessed from and after the time the tax books are received by the city treasurer. Such lien shall be prior and superior to all other liens thereon except liens for taxes.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 89, p. 103;

R.S.1913, § 4563;

C.S.1922, § 3950;

R.S.1943, § 15-819;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 134;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 141.